Oklahoma, session 2025, SB897.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 17 O.S. 2021, Section 180.10, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 180.10. A. There is hereby created in the State
Treasury a fund for the Corporation Commission to be designated the
“Corporation Commission Plugging Fund”. The plugging fund shall
consist of monies received by the Corporation Commission as required
by law to be deposited to the credit of said the fund. The fund
shall be a continuing fund not subject to fiscal year limitations
and shall not be subject to legislative appropriations.
Expenditures from the plugging fund shall be made pursuant to the
laws of this state and the statutes relating to the Corporation
Commission. For each fiscal year, the Commission may expend not
more than eight percent (8%) of the total amount deposited to the
credit of the plugging fund during the previous fiscal year for the
purpose of responding to occurrences of seeping natural gas as
provided for in Section 317.1 of Title 52 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
In addition, expenditures from the plugging fund may be made
pursuant to the Oklahoma Central Purchasing Act, Section 85.1 et

seq. of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes, for purposes of
immediately responding to emergency situations, within the
Commission’s jurisdiction, having potentially critical environmental
or public safety impact. Warrants for expenditures from the fund
shall be drawn by the State Treasurer, based on claims signed by an
authorized employee of the Corporation Commission and approved for
payment by the Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise
Services. The provisions of this act or rules promulgated pursuant
thereto, shall not be construed to relieve or in any way diminish
the surety bonding requirements required by Section 318.1 of Title
52 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
B. Prior to July 1, 2026 July 1, 2031, the plugging fund shall
be maintained at Five Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00). If the
plugging fund falls below the five-million-dollar maintenance level,
the Corporation Commission shall notify the Oklahoma Tax Commission
that the plugging fund has fallen below the required maintenance
level and that the excise tax which has been levied by subsection A
of Section 1101 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes and subsection
A of Section 1102 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes which is
credited and apportioned to the Corporation Commission Plugging Fund
pursuant to Section 1103 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes is to
be imposed. Such additional excise tax shall be imposed and
collected until such time as is necessary to meet the additional
five-million-dollar maintenance level. The Tax Commission shall
notify the persons responsible for payment of the excise tax on oil
and gas of the imposition of such tax. The provisions of this
subsection shall terminate on July 1, 2026 July 1, 2031.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. S. B. NO. 897 Page 2

Passed the Senate the 11th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 6th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 897 Page 3